Wisconsin, session 2025, AB689.
do enact as follows:AB689,13Section 1. 98.09 of the statutes is created to read:AB689,2,7498.09 Motor vehicle fuel pump sticker. (1) The department shall produce 5a sticker, for display on each motor vehicle fuel pump from which motor vehicle fuel 1is dispensed for sale at retail in this state, that shows the federal motor vehicle fuel 2tax rate and the state motor vehicle fuel tax rate, in cents per gallon, for gasoline 3and for diesel fuel. The sticker shall be at least 3.5 inches on each side. The 4department shall distribute the sticker to all inspectors and sealers who inspect or 5seal motor vehicle fuel pumps in this state. The department shall produce and 6distribute a new sticker each time the federal or state motor vehicle fuel tax rate 7changes.AB689,2,128(2) Inspectors and sealers who inspect or seal motor vehicle fuel pumps shall, 9at the time of inspecting or sealing a motor vehicle fuel pump, place the sticker 10produced under sub. (1) on the pump being inspected or sealed. Inspectors and 11sealers shall display the sticker on the face of the pump so that it is clear, 12conspicuous, and prominent to consumers.AB689,2,1513(3) An owner or operator of a motor vehicle fuel pump from which motor 14vehicle fuel is dispensed for sale at retail is not liable for affixing or maintaining a 15sticker under this section.AB689,216Section 2. Effective date.AB689,2,1717(1) This act takes effect on July 1, 2026.AB689,2,1818